Illinois, session 104th, SB2997.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Procurement Code is amended by 5changing Sections 1-10, 1-15.15, and 10-20 and by adding 6Section 1-15.72 as follows: 7    (30 ILCS 500/1-10)8    (Text of Section before amendment by P.A. 104-458)9    Sec. 1-10. Application. 10    (a) This Code applies only to procurements for which 11bidders, offerors, potential contractors, or contractors were 12first solicited on or after July 1, 1998. This Code shall not 13be construed to affect or impair any contract, or any 14provision of a contract, entered into based on a solicitation 15prior to the implementation date of this Code as described in 16Article 99, including, but not limited to, any covenant 17entered into with respect to any revenue bonds or similar 18instruments. All procurements for which contracts are 19solicited between the effective date of Articles 50 and 99 and 20July 1, 1998 shall be substantially in accordance with this 21Code and its intent.22    (b) This Code shall apply regardless of the source of the 23funds with which the contracts are paid, including federal   SB2997- 2 -LRB104 19986 HLH 33437 b1assistance moneys. This Code shall not apply to:2        (1) Contracts between the State and its political 3    subdivisions or other governments, or between State 4    governmental bodies, except as specifically provided in 5    this Code.6        (2) Grants, except for the filing requirements of 7    Section 20-80.8        (2.5) Contracts arising from a grant award if the 9    contract is with a partner whose specific experience and 10    expertise was used as a condition of securing the grant 11    and followed the selection provisions outlined in the 12    grant application. 13        (3) Purchase of care, except as provided in Section 14    5-30.6 of the Illinois Public Aid Code and this Section.15        (4) Hiring of an individual as an employee and not as 16    an independent contractor, whether pursuant to an 17    employment code or policy or by contract directly with 18    that individual.19        (5) Collective bargaining contracts.20        (6) Purchase of real estate, except that notice of 21    this type of contract with a value of more than $25,000 22    must be published in the Procurement Bulletin within 10 23    calendar days after the deed is recorded in the county of 24    jurisdiction. The notice shall identify the real estate 25    purchased, the names of all parties to the contract, the 26    value of the contract, and the effective date of the   SB2997- 3 -LRB104 19986 HLH 33437 b1    contract.2        (7) Contracts necessary to prepare for anticipated 3    litigation, enforcement actions, or investigations, 4    provided that the chief legal counsel to the Governor 5    shall give his or her prior approval when the procuring 6    agency is one subject to the jurisdiction of the Governor, 7    and provided that the chief legal counsel of any other 8    procuring entity subject to this Code shall give his or 9    her prior approval when the procuring entity is not one 10    subject to the jurisdiction of the Governor.11        (8) (Blank).12        (9) Procurement expenditures by the Illinois 13    Conservation Foundation when only private funds are used.14        (10) (Blank). 15        (11) Public-private agreements entered into according 16    to the procurement requirements of Section 20 of the 17    Public-Private Partnerships for Transportation Act and 18    design-build agreements entered into according to the 19    procurement requirements of Section 25 of the 20    Public-Private Partnerships for Transportation Act.21        (12) (A) Contracts for legal, financial, and other 22    professional and artistic services entered into by the 23    Illinois Finance Authority in which the State of Illinois 24    is not obligated. Such contracts shall be awarded through 25    a competitive process authorized by the members of the 26    Illinois Finance Authority and are subject to Sections   SB2997- 4 -LRB104 19986 HLH 33437 b1    5-30, 20-160, 50-13, 50-20, 50-35, and 50-37 of this Code, 2    as well as the final approval by the members of the 3    Illinois Finance Authority of the terms of the contract.4        (B) Contracts for legal and financial services entered 5    into by the Illinois Housing Development Authority in 6    connection with the issuance of bonds in which the State 7    of Illinois is not obligated. Such contracts shall be 8    awarded through a competitive process authorized by the 9    members of the Illinois Housing Development Authority and 10    are subject to Sections 5-30, 20-160, 50-13, 50-20, 50-35, 11    and 50-37 of this Code, as well as the final approval by 12    the members of the Illinois Housing Development Authority 13    of the terms of the contract. 14        (13) Contracts for services, commodities, and 15    equipment to support the delivery of timely forensic 16    science services in consultation with and subject to the 17    approval of the Chief Procurement Officer as provided in 18    subsection (d) of Section 5-4-3a of the Unified Code of 19    Corrections, except for the requirements of Sections 20    20-60, 20-65, 20-70, and 20-160 and Article 50 of this 21    Code; however, the Chief Procurement Officer may, in 22    writing with justification, waive any certification 23    required under Article 50 of this Code. For any contracts 24    for services which are currently provided by members of a 25    collective bargaining agreement, the applicable terms of 26    the collective bargaining agreement concerning   SB2997- 5 -LRB104 19986 HLH 33437 b1    subcontracting shall be followed.2        On and after January 1, 2019, this paragraph (13), 3    except for this sentence, is inoperative. 4        (14) Contracts for participation expenditures required 5    by a domestic or international trade show or exhibition of 6    an exhibitor, member, or sponsor.7        (15) Contracts with a railroad or utility that 8    requires the State to reimburse the railroad or utilities 9    for the relocation of utilities for construction or other 10    public purpose. Contracts included within this paragraph 11    (15) shall include, but not be limited to, those 12    associated with: relocations, crossings, installations, 13    and maintenance. For the purposes of this paragraph (15), 14    "railroad" means any form of non-highway ground 15    transportation that runs on rails or electromagnetic 16    guideways and "utility" means: (1) public utilities as 17    defined in Section 3-105 of the Public Utilities Act, (2) 18    telecommunications carriers as defined in Section 13-202 19    of the Public Utilities Act, (3) electric cooperatives as 20    defined in Section 3.4 of the Electric Supplier Act, (4) 21    telephone or telecommunications cooperatives as defined in 22    Section 13-212 of the Public Utilities Act, (5) rural 23    water or wastewater waste water systems with 10,000 24    connections or less, (6) a holder as defined in Section 25    21-201 of the Public Utilities Act, and (7) municipalities 26    owning or operating utility systems consisting of public   SB2997- 6 -LRB104 19986 HLH 33437 b1    utilities as that term is defined in Section 11-117-2 of 2    the Illinois Municipal Code. 3        (16) Procurement expenditures necessary for the 4    Department of Public Health to provide the delivery of 5    timely newborn screening services in accordance with the 6    Newborn Metabolic Screening Act. 7        (17) Procurement expenditures necessary for the 8    Department of Agriculture, the Department of Financial and 9    Professional Regulation, the Department of Human Services, 10    and the Department of Public Health to implement the 11    Compassionate Use of Medical Cannabis Program and Opioid 12    Alternative Pilot Program requirements and ensure access 13    to medical cannabis for patients with debilitating medical 14    conditions in accordance with the Compassionate Use of 15    Medical Cannabis Program Act.16        (18) This Code does not apply to any procurements 17    necessary for the Department of Agriculture, the 18    Department of Financial and Professional Regulation, the 19    Department of Human Services, the Department of Commerce 20    and Economic Opportunity, and the Department of Public 21    Health to implement the Cannabis Regulation and Tax Act if 22    the applicable agency has made a good faith determination 23    that it is necessary and appropriate for the expenditure 24    to fall within this exemption and if the process is 25    conducted in a manner substantially in accordance with the 26    requirements of Sections 20-160, 25-60, 30-22, 50-5,   SB2997- 7 -LRB104 19986 HLH 33437 b1    50-10, 50-10.5, 50-12, 50-13, 50-15, 50-20, 50-21, 50-35, 2    50-36, 50-37, 50-38, and 50-50 of this Code; however, for 3    Section 50-35, compliance applies only to contracts or 4    subcontracts over $100,000. Notice of each contract 5    entered into under this paragraph (18) that is related to 6    the procurement of goods and services identified in 7    paragraph (1) through (9) of this subsection shall be 8    published in the Procurement Bulletin within 14 calendar 9    days after contract execution. The Chief Procurement 10    Officer shall prescribe the form and content of the 11    notice. Each agency shall provide the Chief Procurement 12    Officer, on a monthly basis, in the form and content 13    prescribed by the Chief Procurement Officer, a report of 14    contracts that are related to the procurement of goods and 15    services identified in this subsection. At a minimum, this 16    report shall include the name of the contractor, a 17    description of the supply or service provided, the total 18    amount of the contract, the term of the contract, and the 19    exception to this Code utilized. A copy of any or all of 20    these contracts shall be made available to the Chief 21    Procurement Officer immediately upon request. The Chief 22    Procurement Officer shall submit a report to the Governor 23    and General Assembly no later than November 1 of each year 24    that includes, at a minimum, an annual summary of the 25    monthly information reported to the Chief Procurement 26    Officer. This exemption becomes inoperative 5 years after   SB2997- 8 -LRB104 19986 HLH 33437 b1    June 25, 2019 (the effective date of Public Act 101-27).2        (19) Acquisition of modifications or adjustments, 3    limited to assistive technology devices and assistive 4    technology services, adaptive equipment, repairs, and 5    replacement parts to provide reasonable accommodations (i) 6    that enable a qualified applicant with a disability to 7    complete the job application process and be considered for 8    the position such qualified applicant desires, (ii) that 9    modify or adjust the work environment to enable a 10    qualified current employee with a disability to perform 11    the essential functions of the position held by that 12    employee, (iii) to enable a qualified current employee 13    with a disability to enjoy equal benefits and privileges 14    of employment as are enjoyed by other similarly situated 15    employees without disabilities, and (iv) that allow a 16    customer, client, claimant, or member of the public 17    seeking State services full use and enjoyment of and 18    access to its programs, services, or benefits. 19        For purposes of this paragraph (19):20        "Assistive technology devices" means any item, piece 21    of equipment, or product system, whether acquired 22    commercially off the shelf, modified, or customized, that 23    is used to increase, maintain, or improve functional 24    capabilities of individuals with disabilities.25        "Assistive technology services" means any service that 26    directly assists an individual with a disability in   SB2997- 9 -LRB104 19986 HLH 33437 b1    selection, acquisition, or use of an assistive technology 2    device.3        "Qualified" has the same meaning and use as provided 4    under the federal Americans with Disabilities Act when 5    describing an individual with a disability. 6        (20) Procurement expenditures necessary for the 7    Illinois Commerce Commission to hire third-party 8    facilitators pursuant to Sections 16-105.17 and 16-108.18 9    of the Public Utilities Act or an ombudsman pursuant to 10    Section 16-107.5 of the Public Utilities Act, a 11    facilitator pursuant to Section 16-105.17 of the Public 12    Utilities Act, or a grid auditor pursuant to Section 13    16-105.10 of the Public Utilities Act. 14        (21) Procurement expenditures for the purchase, 15    renewal, and expansion of software, software licenses, or 16    software maintenance agreements that support the efforts 17    of the Illinois State Police to enforce, regulate, and 18    administer the Firearm Owners Identification Card Act, the 19    Firearm Concealed Carry Act, the Firearms Restraining 20    Order Act, the Firearm Dealer License Certification Act, 21    the Law Enforcement Agencies Data System (LEADS), the 22    Uniform Crime Reporting Act, the Criminal Identification 23    Act, the Illinois Uniform Conviction Information Act, and 24    the Gun Trafficking Information Act, or establish or 25    maintain record management systems necessary to conduct 26    human trafficking investigations or gun trafficking or   SB2997- 10 -LRB104 19986 HLH 33437 b1    other stolen firearm investigations. This paragraph (21) 2    applies to contracts entered into on or after January 10, 3    2023 (the effective date of Public Act 102-1116) and the 4    renewal of contracts that are in effect on January 10, 5    2023 (the effective date of Public Act 102-1116). 6        (22) Contracts for project management services and 7    system integration services required for the completion of 8    the State's enterprise resource planning project. This 9    exemption becomes inoperative 5 years after June 7, 2023 10    (the effective date of the changes made to this Section by 11    Public Act 103-8). This paragraph (22) applies to 12    contracts entered into on or after June 7, 2023 (the 13    effective date of the changes made to this Section by 14    Public Act 103-8) and the renewal of contracts that are in 15    effect on June 7, 2023 (the effective date of the changes 16    made to this Section by Public Act 103-8). 17        (23) Procurements necessary for the Department of 18    Insurance to implement the Illinois Health Benefits 19    Exchange Law if the Department of Insurance has made a 20    good faith determination that it is necessary and 21    appropriate for the expenditure to fall within this 22    exemption. The procurement process shall be conducted in a 23    manner substantially in accordance with the requirements 24    of Sections 20-160 and 25-60 and Article 50 of this Code. A 25    copy of these contracts shall be made available to the 26    Chief Procurement Officer immediately upon request. This   SB2997- 11 -LRB104 19986 HLH 33437 b1    paragraph is inoperative 5 years after June 27, 2023 (the 2    effective date of Public Act 103-103). 3        (24) Contracts for public education programming, 4    noncommercial sustaining announcements, public service 5    announcements, and public awareness and education 6    messaging with the nonprofit trade associations of the 7    providers of those services that inform the public on 8    immediate and ongoing health and safety risks and hazards. 9        (25) Procurements necessary for the Department of 10    Early Childhood to implement the Department of Early 11    Childhood Act if the Department has made a good faith 12    determination that it is necessary and appropriate for the 13    expenditure to fall within this exemption. This exemption 14    shall only be used for products and services procured 15    solely for use by the Department of Early Childhood. The 16    procurements may include those necessary to design and 17    build integrated, operational systems of programs and 18    services. The procurements may include, but are not 19    limited to, those necessary to align and update program 20    standards, integrate funding systems, design and establish 21    data and reporting systems, align and update models for 22    technical assistance and professional development, design 23    systems to manage grants and ensure compliance, design and 24    implement management and operational structures, and 25    establish new means of engaging with families, educators, 26    providers, and stakeholders. The procurement processes   SB2997- 12 -LRB104 19986 HLH 33437 b1    shall be conducted in a manner substantially in accordance 2    with the requirements of Article 50 (ethics) and Sections 3    5-5 (Procurement Policy Board), 5-7 (Commission on Equity 4    and Inclusion), 20-80 (contract files), 20-120 5    (subcontractors), 20-155 (paperwork), 20-160 6    (ethics/campaign contribution prohibitions), 25-60 7    (prevailing wage), and 25-90 (prohibited and authorized 8    cybersecurity) of this Code. Beginning January 1, 2025, 9    the Department of Early Childhood shall provide a 10    quarterly report to the General Assembly detailing a list 11    of expenditures and contracts for which the Department 12    uses this exemption. This paragraph is inoperative on and 13    after July 1, 2027. 14        (26) Procurements that are necessary for increasing 15    the recruitment and retention of State employees, 16    particularly minority candidates for employment, 17    including: 18            (A) procurements related to registration fees for 19        job fairs and other outreach and recruitment events;20            (B) production of recruitment materials; and21            (C) other services related to recruitment and 22        retention of State employees.23        The exemption under this paragraph (26) applies only 24    if the State agency has made a good faith determination 25    that it is necessary and appropriate for the expenditure 26    to fall within this paragraph (26). The procurement   SB2997- 13 -LRB104 19986 HLH 33437 b1    process under this paragraph (26) shall be conducted in a 2    manner substantially in accordance with the requirements 3    of Sections 20-160 and 25-60 and Article 50 of this Code. A 4    copy of these contracts shall be made available to the 5    Chief Procurement Officer immediately upon request. 6    Nothing in this paragraph (26) authorizes the replacement 7    or diminishment of State responsibilities in hiring or the 8    positions that effectuate that hiring. This paragraph (26) 9    is inoperative on and after June 30, 2029. 10        (27) Procurements necessary for the Department of 11    Healthcare and Family Services to implement changes to the 12    State's Integrated Eligibility System to ensure the 13    system's compliance with federal implementation mandates 14    and deadlines, if the Department of Healthcare and Family 15    Services has made a good faith determination that it is 16    necessary and appropriate for the procurement to fall 17    within this exemption. 18    Notwithstanding any other provision of law, for contracts 19with an annual value of more than $100,000 entered into on or 20after October 1, 2017 under an exemption provided in any 21paragraph of this subsection (b), except paragraph (1), (2), 22or (5), each State agency shall post to the appropriate 23procurement bulletin the name of the contractor, a description 24of the supply or service provided, the total amount of the 25contract, the term of the contract, and the exception to the 26Code utilized. The chief procurement officer shall submit a   SB2997- 14 -LRB104 19986 HLH 33437 b1report to the Governor and General Assembly no later than 2November 1 of each year that shall include, at a minimum, an 3annual summary of the monthly information reported to the 4chief procurement officer. 5    (c) This Code does not apply to the electric power 6procurement process provided for under Section 1-75 of the 7Illinois Power Agency Act and Section 16-111.5 of the Public 8Utilities Act. This Code does not apply to the procurement of 9technical and policy experts pursuant to Section 1-129 of the 10Illinois Power Agency Act. 11    (d) Except for Section 20-160 and Article 50 of this Code, 12and as expressly required by Section 9.1 of the Illinois 13Lottery Law, the provisions of this Code do not apply to the 14procurement process provided for under Section 9.1 of the 15Illinois Lottery Law. 16    (e) This Code does not apply to the process used by the 17Capital Development Board to retain a person or entity to 18assist the Capital Development Board with its duties related 19to the determination of costs of a clean coal SNG brownfield 20facility, as defined by Section 1-10 of the Illinois Power 21Agency Act, as required in subsection (h-3) of Section 9-220 22of the Public Utilities Act, including calculating the range 23of capital costs, the range of operating and maintenance 24costs, or the sequestration costs or monitoring the 25construction of clean coal SNG brownfield facility for the 26full duration of construction.  SB2997- 15 -LRB104 19986 HLH 33437 b1    (f) (Blank). 2    (g) (Blank).3    (h) This Code does not apply to the process to procure or 4contracts entered into in accordance with Sections 11-5.2 and 511-5.3 of the Illinois Public Aid Code. 6    (i) Each chief procurement officer may access records 7necessary to review whether a contract, purchase, or other 8expenditure is or is not subject to the provisions of this 9Code, unless such records would be subject to attorney-client 10privilege. 11    (j) This Code does not apply to the process used by the 12Capital Development Board to retain an artist or work or works 13of art as required in Section 14 of the Capital Development 14Board Act. 15    (k) This Code does not apply to the process to procure 16contracts, or contracts entered into, by the State Board of 17Elections or the State Electoral Board for hearing officers 18appointed pursuant to the Election Code. 19    (l) This Code does not apply to the processes used by the 20Illinois Student Assistance Commission to procure supplies and 21services paid for from the private funds of the Illinois 22Prepaid Tuition Fund. As used in this subsection (l), "private 23funds" means funds derived from deposits paid into the 24Illinois Prepaid Tuition Trust Fund and the earnings thereon. 25    (m) This Code shall apply regardless of the source of 26funds with which contracts are paid, including federal   SB2997- 16 -LRB104 19986 HLH 33437 b1assistance moneys. Except as specifically provided in this 2Code, this Code shall not apply to procurement expenditures 3necessary for the Department of Public Health to conduct the 4Healthy Illinois Survey in accordance with Section 2310-431 of 5the Department of Public Health Powers and Duties Law of the 6Civil Administrative Code of Illinois. 7(Source: P.A. 103-8, eff. 6-7-23; 103-103, eff. 6-27-23; 8103-570, eff. 1-1-24; 103-580, eff. 12-8-23; 103-594, eff. 96-25-24; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 103-865, eff. 1-1-25; 104-2, 10eff. 6-16-25; 104-417, eff. 8-15-25) 11    (Text of Section after amendment by P.A. 104-458)12    Sec. 1-10. Application. 13    (a) This Code applies only to procurements for which 14bidders, offerors, potential contractors, or contractors were 15first solicited on or after July 1, 1998. This Code shall not 16be construed to affect or impair any contract, or any 17provision of a contract, entered into based on a solicitation 18prior to the implementation date of this Code as described in 19Article 99, including, but not limited to, any covenant 20entered into with respect to any revenue bonds or similar 21instruments. All procurements for which contracts are 22solicited between the effective date of Articles 50 and 99 and 23July 1, 1998 shall be substantially in accordance with this 24Code and its intent.25    (b) This Code shall apply regardless of the source of the   SB2997- 17 -LRB104 19986 HLH 33437 b1funds with which the contracts are paid, including federal 2assistance moneys. This Code shall not apply to:3        (1) Contracts between the State and its political 4    subdivisions or other governments, or between State 5    governmental bodies, except as specifically provided in 6    this Code.7        (2) Grants, except for the filing requirements of 8    Section 20-80.9        (2.5) Contracts arising from a grant award if the 10    contract is with a partner whose specific experience and 11    expertise was used as a condition of securing the grant 12    and followed the selection provisions outlined in the 13    grant application. 14        (3) Purchase of care, except as provided in Section 15    5-30.6 of the Illinois Public Aid Code and this Section.16        (4) Hiring of an individual as an employee and not as 17    an independent contractor, whether pursuant to an 18    employment code or policy or by contract directly with 19    that individual.20        (5) Collective bargaining contracts.21        (6) Purchase of real estate, except that notice of 22    this type of contract with a value of more than $25,000 23    must be published in the Procurement Bulletin within 10 24    calendar days after the deed is recorded in the county of 25    jurisdiction. The notice shall identify the real estate 26    purchased, the names of all parties to the contract, the   SB2997- 18 -LRB104 19986 HLH 33437 b1    value of the contract, and the effective date of the 2    contract.3        (7) Contracts necessary to prepare for anticipated 4    litigation, enforcement actions, or investigations, 5    provided that the chief legal counsel to the Governor 6    shall give his or her prior approval when the procuring 7    agency is one subject to the jurisdiction of the Governor, 8    and provided that the chief legal counsel of any other 9    procuring entity subject to this Code shall give his or 10    her prior approval when the procuring entity is not one 11    subject to the jurisdiction of the Governor.12        (8) (Blank).13        (9) Procurement expenditures by the Illinois 14    Conservation Foundation when only private funds are used.15        (10) (Blank). 16        (11) Public-private agreements entered into according 17    to the procurement requirements of Section 20 of the 18    Public-Private Partnerships for Transportation Act and 19    design-build agreements entered into according to the 20    procurement requirements of Section 25 of the 21    Public-Private Partnerships for Transportation Act.22        (12) (A) Contracts for legal, financial, and other 23    professional and artistic services entered into by the 24    Illinois Finance Authority in which the State of Illinois 25    is not obligated. Such contracts shall be awarded through 26    a competitive process authorized by the members of the   SB2997- 19 -LRB104 19986 HLH 33437 b1    Illinois Finance Authority and are subject to Sections 2    5-30, 20-160, 50-13, 50-20, 50-35, and 50-37 of this Code, 3    as well as the final approval by the members of the 4    Illinois Finance Authority of the terms of the contract.5        (B) Contracts for legal and financial services entered 6    into by the Illinois Housing Development Authority in 7    connection with the issuance of bonds in which the State 8    of Illinois is not obligated. Such contracts shall be 9    awarded through a competitive process authorized by the 10    members of the Illinois Housing Development Authority and 11    are subject to Sections 5-30, 20-160, 50-13, 50-20, 50-35, 12    and 50-37 of this Code, as well as the final approval by 13    the members of the Illinois Housing Development Authority 14    of the terms of the contract. 15        (13) Contracts for services, commodities, and 16    equipment to support the delivery of timely forensic 17    science services in consultation with and subject to the 18    approval of the Chief Procurement Officer as provided in 19    subsection (d) of Section 5-4-3a of the Unified Code of 20    Corrections, except for the requirements of Sections 21    20-60, 20-65, 20-70, and 20-160 and Article 50 of this 22    Code; however, the Chief Procurement Officer may, in 23    writing with justification, waive any certification 24    required under Article 50 of this Code. For any contracts 25    for services which are currently provided by members of a 26    collective bargaining agreement, the applicable terms of   SB2997- 20 -LRB104 19986 HLH 33437 b1    the collective bargaining agreement concerning 2    subcontracting shall be followed.3        On and after January 1, 2019, this paragraph (13), 4    except for this sentence, is inoperative. 5        (14) Contracts for participation expenditures required 6    by a domestic or international trade show or exhibition of 7    an exhibitor, member, or sponsor.8        (15) Contracts with a railroad or utility that 9    requires the State to reimburse the railroad or utilities 10    for the relocation of utilities for construction or other 11    public purpose. Contracts included within this paragraph 12    (15) shall include, but not be limited to, those 13    associated with: relocations, crossings, installations, 14    and maintenance. For the purposes of this paragraph (15), 15    "railroad" means any form of non-highway ground 16    transportation that runs on rails or electromagnetic 17    guideways and "utility" means: (1) public utilities as 18    defined in Section 3-105 of the Public Utilities Act, (2) 19    telecommunications carriers as defined in Section 13-202 20    of the Public Utilities Act, (3) electric cooperatives as 21    defined in Section 3.4 of the Electric Supplier Act, (4) 22    telephone or telecommunications cooperatives as defined in 23    Section 13-212 of the Public Utilities Act, (5) rural 24    water or wastewater waste water systems with 10,000 25    connections or less, (6) a holder as defined in Section 26    21-201 of the Public Utilities Act, and (7) municipalities   SB2997- 21 -LRB104 19986 HLH 33437 b1    owning or operating utility systems consisting of public 2    utilities as that term is defined in Section 11-117-2 of 3    the Illinois Municipal Code. 4        (16) Procurement expenditures necessary for the 5    Department of Public Health to provide the delivery of 6    timely newborn screening services in accordance with the 7    Newborn Metabolic Screening Act. 8        (17) Procurement expenditures necessary for the 9    Department of Agriculture, the Department of Financial and 10    Professional Regulation, the Department of Human Services, 11    and the Department of Public Health to implement the 12    Compassionate Use of Medical Cannabis Program and Opioid 13    Alternative Pilot Program requirements and ensure access 14    to medical cannabis for patients with debilitating medical 15    conditions in accordance with the Compassionate Use of 16    Medical Cannabis Program Act.17        (18) This Code does not apply to any procurements 18    necessary for the Department of Agriculture, the 19    Department of Financial and Professional Regulation, the 20    Department of Human Services, the Department of Commerce 21    and Economic Opportunity, and the Department of Public 22    Health to implement the Cannabis Regulation and Tax Act if 23    the applicable agency has made a good faith determination 24    that it is necessary and appropriate for the expenditure 25    to fall within this exemption and if the process is 26    conducted in a manner substantially in accordance with the   SB2997- 22 -LRB104 19986 HLH 33437 b1    requirements of Sections 20-160, 25-60, 30-22, 50-5, 2    50-10, 50-10.5, 50-12, 50-13, 50-15, 50-20, 50-21, 50-35, 3    50-36, 50-37, 50-38, and 50-50 of this Code; however, for 4    Section 50-35, compliance applies only to contracts or 5    subcontracts over $100,000. Notice of each contract 6    entered into under this paragraph (18) that is related to 7    the procurement of goods and services identified in 8    paragraph (1) through (9) of this subsection shall be 9    published in the Procurement Bulletin within 14 calendar 10    days after contract execution. The Chief Procurement 11    Officer shall prescribe the form and content of the 12    notice. Each agency shall provide the Chief Procurement 13    Officer, on a monthly basis, in the form and content 14    prescribed by the Chief Procurement Officer, a report of 15    contracts that are related to the procurement of goods and 16    services identified in this subsection. At a minimum, this 17    report shall include the name of the contractor, a 18    description of the supply or service provided, the total 19    amount of the contract, the term of the contract, and the 20    exception to this Code utilized. A copy of any or all of 21    these contracts shall be made available to the Chief 22    Procurement Officer immediately upon request. The Chief 23    Procurement Officer shall submit a report to the Governor 24    and General Assembly no later than November 1 of each year 25    that includes, at a minimum, an annual summary of the 26    monthly information reported to the Chief Procurement   SB2997- 23 -LRB104 19986 HLH 33437 b1    Officer. This exemption becomes inoperative 5 years after 2    June 25, 2019 (the effective date of Public Act 101-27).3        (19) Acquisition of modifications or adjustments, 4    limited to assistive technology devices and assistive 5    technology services, adaptive equipment, repairs, and 6    replacement parts to provide reasonable accommodations (i) 7    that enable a qualified applicant with a disability to 8    complete the job application process and be considered for 9    the position such qualified applicant desires, (ii) that 10    modify or adjust the work environment to enable a 11    qualified current employee with a disability to perform 12    the essential functions of the position held by that 13    employee, (iii) to enable a qualified current employee 14    with a disability to enjoy equal benefits and privileges 15    of employment as are enjoyed by other similarly situated 16    employees without disabilities, and (iv) that allow a 17    customer, client, claimant, or member of the public 18    seeking State services full use and enjoyment of and 19    access to its programs, services, or benefits. 20        For purposes of this paragraph (19):21        "Assistive technology devices" means any item, piece 22    of equipment, or product system, whether acquired 23    commercially off the shelf, modified, or customized, that 24    is used to increase, maintain, or improve functional 25    capabilities of individuals with disabilities.26        "Assistive technology services" means any service that   SB2997- 24 -LRB104 19986 HLH 33437 b1    directly assists an individual with a disability in 2    selection, acquisition, or use of an assistive technology 3    device.4        "Qualified" has the same meaning and use as provided 5    under the federal Americans with Disabilities Act when 6    describing an individual with a disability. 7        (20) Procurement expenditures necessary for the 8    Illinois Commerce Commission to hire third-party 9    facilitators pursuant to Sections 16-105.17 and 16-108.18 10    of the Public Utilities Act or an ombudsman pursuant to 11    Section 16-107.5 of the Public Utilities Act, a 12    facilitator pursuant to Section 16-105.17 of the Public 13    Utilities Act, a grid auditor pursuant to Section 14    16-105.10 of the Public Utilities Act, a facilitator, 15    expert, or consultant pursuant to Sections 16-126.2 and 16    16-202 of the Public Utilities Act, a procurement monitor 17    pursuant to Section 16-111.5 of the Public Utilities Act, 18    an ombudsperson pursuant to Section 20-145 of the Public 19    Utilities Act, or consultants and experts pursuant to 20    Section 5-15 of the Utility Data Access Act. 21        (21) Procurement expenditures for the purchase, 22    renewal, and expansion of software, software licenses, or 23    software maintenance agreements that support the efforts 24    of the Illinois State Police to enforce, regulate, and 25    administer the Firearm Owners Identification Card Act, the 26    Firearm Concealed Carry Act, the Firearms Restraining   SB2997- 25 -LRB104 19986 HLH 33437 b1    Order Act, the Firearm Dealer License Certification Act, 2    the Law Enforcement Agencies Data System (LEADS), the 3    Uniform Crime Reporting Act, the Criminal Identification 4    Act, the Illinois Uniform Conviction Information Act, and 5    the Gun Trafficking Information Act, or establish or 6    maintain record management systems necessary to conduct 7    human trafficking investigations or gun trafficking or 8    other stolen firearm investigations. This paragraph (21) 9    applies to contracts entered into on or after January 10, 10    2023 (the effective date of Public Act 102-1116) and the 11    renewal of contracts that are in effect on January 10, 12    2023 (the effective date of Public Act 102-1116). 13        (22) Contracts for project management services and 14    system integration services required for the completion of 15    the State's enterprise resource planning project. This 16    exemption becomes inoperative 5 years after June 7, 2023 17    (the effective date of the changes made to this Section by 18    Public Act 103-8). This paragraph (22) applies to 19    contracts entered into on or after June 7, 2023 (the 20    effective date of the changes made to this Section by 21    Public Act 103-8) and the renewal of contracts that are in 22    effect on June 7, 2023 (the effective date of the changes 23    made to this Section by Public Act 103-8). 24        (23) Procurements necessary for the Department of 25    Insurance to implement the Illinois Health Benefits 26    Exchange Law if the Department of Insurance has made a   SB2997- 26 -LRB104 19986 HLH 33437 b1    good faith determination that it is necessary and 2    appropriate for the expenditure to fall within this 3    exemption. The procurement process shall be conducted in a 4    manner substantially in accordance with the requirements 5    of Sections 20-160 and 25-60 and Article 50 of this Code. A 6    copy of these contracts shall be made available to the 7    Chief Procurement Officer immediately upon request. This 8    paragraph is inoperative 5 years after June 27, 2023 (the 9    effective date of Public Act 103-103). 10        (24) Contracts for public education programming, 11    noncommercial sustaining announcements, public service 12    announcements, and public awareness and education 13    messaging with the nonprofit trade associations of the 14    providers of those services that inform the public on 15    immediate and ongoing health and safety risks and hazards. 16        (25) Procurements necessary for the Department of 17    Early Childhood to implement the Department of Early 18    Childhood Act if the Department has made a good faith 19    determination that it is necessary and appropriate for the 20    expenditure to fall within this exemption. This exemption 21    shall only be used for products and services procured 22    solely for use by the Department of Early Childhood. The 23    procurements may include those necessary to design and 24    build integrated, operational systems of programs and 25    services. The procurements may include, but are not 26    limited to, those necessary to align and update program   SB2997- 27 -LRB104 19986 HLH 33437 b1    standards, integrate funding systems, design and establish 2    data and reporting systems, align and update models for 3    technical assistance and professional development, design 4    systems to manage grants and ensure compliance, design and 5    implement management and operational structures, and 6    establish new means of engaging with families, educators, 7    providers, and stakeholders. The procurement processes 8    shall be conducted in a manner substantially in accordance 9    with the requirements of Article 50 (ethics) and Sections 10    5-5 (Procurement Policy Board), 5-7 (Commission on Equity 11    and Inclusion), 20-80 (contract files), 20-120 12    (subcontractors), 20-155 (paperwork), 20-160 13    (ethics/campaign contribution prohibitions), 25-60 14    (prevailing wage), and 25-90 (prohibited and authorized 15    cybersecurity) of this Code. Beginning January 1, 2025, 16    the Department of Early Childhood shall provide a 17    quarterly report to the General Assembly detailing a list 18    of expenditures and contracts for which the Department 19    uses this exemption. This paragraph is inoperative on and 20    after July 1, 2027. 21        (26) Procurements that are necessary for increasing 22    the recruitment and retention of State employees, 23    particularly minority candidates for employment, 24    including: 25            (A) procurements related to registration fees for 26        job fairs and other outreach and recruitment events;  SB2997- 28 -LRB104 19986 HLH 33437 b1            (B) production of recruitment materials; and2            (C) other services related to recruitment and 3        retention of State employees.4        The exemption under this paragraph (26) applies only 5    if the State agency has made a good faith determination 6    that it is necessary and appropriate for the expenditure 7    to fall within this paragraph (26). The procurement 8    process under this paragraph (26) shall be conducted in a 9    manner substantially in accordance with the requirements 10    of Sections 20-160 and 25-60 and Article 50 of this Code. A 11    copy of these contracts shall be made available to the 12    Chief Procurement Officer immediately upon request. 13    Nothing in this paragraph (26) authorizes the replacement 14    or diminishment of State responsibilities in hiring or the 15    positions that effectuate that hiring. This paragraph (26) 16    is inoperative on and after June 30, 2029. 17        (27) Procurements necessary for the Department of 18    Healthcare and Family Services to implement changes to the 19    State's Integrated Eligibility System to ensure the 20    system's compliance with federal implementation mandates 21    and deadlines, if the Department of Healthcare and Family 22    Services has made a good faith determination that it is 23    necessary and appropriate for the procurement to fall 24    within this exemption. 25    Notwithstanding any other provision of law, for contracts 26with an annual value of more than $100,000 entered into on or   SB2997- 29 -LRB104 19986 HLH 33437 b1after October 1, 2017 under an exemption provided in any 2paragraph of this subsection (b), except paragraph (1), (2), 3or (5), each State agency shall post to the appropriate 4procurement bulletin the name of the contractor, a description 5of the supply or service provided, the total amount of the 6contract, the term of the contract, and the exception to the 7Code utilized. The chief procurement officer shall submit a 8report to the Governor and General Assembly no later than 9November 1 of each year that shall include, at a minimum, an 10annual summary of the monthly information reported to the 11chief procurement officer. 12    (c) This Code does not apply to the electric power 13procurement process provided for under Section 1-75 of the 14Illinois Power Agency Act and Section 16-111.5 of the Public 15Utilities Act. This Code does not apply to the procurement of 16technical and policy experts pursuant to Section 1-129 of the 17Illinois Power Agency Act. 18    (d) Except for Section 20-160 and Article 50 of this Code, 19and as expressly required by Section 9.1 of the Illinois 20Lottery Law, the provisions of this Code do not apply to the 21procurement process provided for under Section 9.1 of the 22Illinois Lottery Law. 23    (e) This Code does not apply to the process used by the 24Capital Development Board to retain a person or entity to 25assist the Capital Development Board with its duties related 26to the determination of costs of a clean coal SNG brownfield   SB2997- 30 -LRB104 19986 HLH 33437 b1facility, as defined by Section 1-10 of the Illinois Power 2Agency Act, as required in subsection (h-3) of Section 9-220 3of the Public Utilities Act, including calculating the range 4of capital costs, the range of operating and maintenance 5costs, or the sequestration costs or monitoring the 6construction of clean coal SNG brownfield facility for the 7full duration of construction.8    (f) (Blank). 9    (g) (Blank).10    (h) This Code does not apply to the process to procure or 11contracts entered into in accordance with Sections 11-5.2 and 1211-5.3 of the Illinois Public Aid Code. 13    (i) Each chief procurement officer may access records 14necessary to review whether a contract, purchase, or other 15expenditure is or is not subject to the provisions of this 16Code, unless such records would be subject to attorney-client 17privilege. 18    (j) This Code does not apply to the process used by the 19Capital Development Board to retain an artist or work or works 20of art as required in Section 14 of the Capital Development 21Board Act. 22    (k) This Code does not apply to the process to procure 23contracts, or contracts entered into, by the State Board of 24Elections or the State Electoral Board for hearing officers 25appointed pursuant to the Election Code. 26    (l) This Code does not apply to the processes used by the   SB2997- 31 -LRB104 19986 HLH 33437 b1Illinois Student Assistance Commission to procure supplies and 2services paid for from the private funds of the Illinois 3Prepaid Tuition Fund. As used in this subsection (l), "private 4funds" means funds derived from deposits paid into the 5Illinois Prepaid Tuition Trust Fund and the earnings thereon. 6    (m) This Code shall apply regardless of the source of 7funds with which contracts are paid, including federal 8assistance moneys. Except as specifically provided in this 9Code, this Code shall not apply to procurement expenditures 10necessary for the Department of Public Health to conduct the 11Healthy Illinois Survey in accordance with Section 2310-431 of 12the Department of Public Health Powers and Duties Law of the 13Civil Administrative Code of Illinois. 14(Source: P.A. 103-8, eff. 6-7-23; 103-103, eff. 6-27-23; 15103-570, eff. 1-1-24; 103-580, eff. 12-8-23; 103-594, eff. 166-25-24; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 103-865, eff. 1-1-25; 104-2, 17eff. 6-16-25; 104-417, eff. 8-15-25; 104-458, eff. 6-1-26; 18revised 1-12-26.) 19    (30 ILCS 500/1-15.15)20    Sec. 1-15.15. Chief Procurement Officer. "Chief 21Procurement Officer" means any of the 4 persons appointed or 22approved by a majority of the members of the Executive Ethics 23Commission:24        (1) for procurements for (i) construction and 25    construction-related services committed by law to the   SB2997- 32 -LRB104 19986 HLH 33437 b1    jurisdiction or responsibility of the Capital Development 2    Board or (ii) construction-related services committed by 3    law to the jurisdiction or responsibility of the 4    Department of Central Management Services under Section 5    405-217 of the Department of Central Management Services 6    Law of the Civil Administrative Code of Illinois and other 7    related provisions of this amendatory Act of the 104th 8    General Assembly, the independent chief procurement 9    officer appointed by a majority of the members of the 10    Executive Ethics Commission.11        (2) for procurements for all construction, 12    construction support, construction-related services, the 13    operation of any facility, the purchase of rolling stock, 14    and the provision of any construction or 15    construction-related service or activity committed by law 16    to the jurisdiction or responsibility of the Illinois 17    Department of Transportation, including the direct or 18    reimbursable expenditure of all federal funds for which 19    the Department of Transportation is responsible or 20    accountable for the use thereof in accordance with federal 21    law, regulation, or procedure, the independent chief 22    procurement officer appointed by the Secretary of 23    Transportation with the consent of the majority of the 24    members of the Executive Ethics Commission.25        (3) for all procurements made by a public institution 26    of higher education, the independent chief procurement   SB2997- 33 -LRB104 19986 HLH 33437 b1    officer appointed by a majority of the members of the 2    Executive Ethics Commission.3        (4) (Blank). 4        (5) for all other procurements, the independent chief 5    procurement officer appointed by a majority of the members 6    of the Executive Ethics Commission.7(Source: P.A. 104-2, eff. 6-16-25.) 8    (30 ILCS 500/1-15.72 new)9    Sec. 1-15.72. Rolling stock. "Rolling stock" means buses, 10vans, cars, railcars, locomotives, trolley cars, trucks, and 11ferryboats as well as any vehicles used for support services, 12public transportation, or construction. 13    (30 ILCS 500/10-20)14    Sec. 10-20. Independent chief procurement officers.15    (a) Appointment. Within 60 calendar days after July 1, 162010 (the effective date of Public Act 96-795), the Executive 17Ethics Commission, with the advice and consent of the Senate 18shall appoint or approve 4 chief procurement officers, one for 19each of the following categories:20        (1) for procurements for (i) construction and 21    construction-related services committed by law to the 22    jurisdiction or responsibility of the Capital Development 23    Board or (ii) construction-related services committed by 24    law to the jurisdiction or responsibility of the   SB2997- 34 -LRB104 19986 HLH 33437 b1    Department for Central Management Services under Section 2    405-217 of the Department of Central Management Services 3    Law of the Civil Administrative Code of Illinois and other 4    related provisions of this amendatory Act of the 104th 5    General Assembly;6        (2) for procurements for all construction, 7    construction support, construction-related services, the 8    operation of any facility, the purchase of rolling stock, 9    and the provision of any service or activity committed by 10    law to the jurisdiction or responsibility of the Illinois 11    Department of Transportation, including the direct or 12    reimbursable expenditure of all federal funds for which 13    the Department of Transportation is responsible or 14    accountable for the use thereof in accordance with federal 15    law, regulation, or procedure, the chief procurement 16    officer recommended for approval under this item appointed 17    by the Secretary of Transportation after consent by the 18    Executive Ethics Commission;19        (3) for all procurements made by a public institution 20    of higher education; and21        (4) for all other procurement needs of State agencies. 22    For fiscal years 2024, 2025, and 2026, the Executive 23Ethics Commission shall set aside from its appropriation those 24amounts necessary for the use of the 4 chief procurement 25officers for the ordinary and contingent expenses of their 26respective procurement offices. From the amounts set aside by   SB2997- 35 -LRB104 19986 HLH 33437 b1the Commission, each chief procurement officer shall control 2the internal operations of his or her procurement office and 3shall procure the necessary equipment, materials, and services 4to perform the duties of that office, including hiring 5necessary procurement personnel, legal advisors, and other 6employees, and may establish, in the exercise of the chief 7procurement officer's discretion, the compensation of the 8office's employees, which includes the State purchasing 9officers and any legal advisors. The Executive Ethics 10Commission shall have no control over the employees of the 11chief procurement officers. The Executive Ethics Commission 12shall provide administrative support services, including 13payroll, for each procurement office. 14    (b) Terms and independence. Each chief procurement officer 15appointed under this Section shall serve for a term of 5 years 16beginning on the date of the officer's appointment. The chief 17procurement officer may be removed for cause after a hearing 18by the Executive Ethics Commission. The Governor or the 19director of a State agency directly responsible to the 20Governor may institute a complaint against the officer by 21filing such complaint with the Commission. The Commission 22shall have a hearing based on the complaint. The officer and 23the complainant shall receive reasonable notice of the hearing 24and shall be permitted to present their respective arguments 25on the complaint. After the hearing, the Commission shall make 26a finding on the complaint and may take disciplinary action,   SB2997- 36 -LRB104 19986 HLH 33437 b1including, but not limited to, removal of the officer.2    The salary of a chief procurement officer shall be 3established by the Executive Ethics Commission and may not be 4diminished during the officer's term. The salary may not 5exceed the salary of the director of a State agency for which 6the officer serves as chief procurement officer.7    (c) Qualifications. In addition to any other requirement 8or qualification required by State law, each chief procurement 9officer must within 12 months of employment be a Certified 10Professional Public Buyer or a Certified Public Purchasing 11Officer, pursuant to certification by the Universal Public 12Purchasing Certification Council, and must reside in Illinois.13    (d) Fiduciary duty. Each chief procurement officer owes a 14fiduciary duty to the State.15    (e) Vacancy. In case of a vacancy in one or more of the 16offices of a chief procurement officer under this Section 17during the recess of the Senate, the Executive Ethics 18Commission shall make a temporary appointment until the next 19meeting of the Senate, when the Executive Ethics Commission 20shall nominate some person to fill the office, and any person 21so nominated who is confirmed by the Senate shall hold office 22during the remainder of the term and until his or her successor 23is appointed and qualified. If the Senate is not in session at 24the time Public Act 96-920 takes effect, the Executive Ethics 25Commission shall make a temporary appointment as in the case 26of a vacancy.  SB2997- 37 -LRB104 19986 HLH 33437 b1    (f) (Blank).2    (g) (Blank). 3(Source: P.A. 103-8, eff. 6-7-23; 103-588, eff. 6-5-24; 4103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 103-865, eff. 1-1-25; 104-2, eff. 56-16-25.) 6    Section 10. The Governmental Joint Purchasing Act is 7amended by changing Section 2 as follows: 8    (30 ILCS 525/2)  (from Ch. 85, par. 1602)9    Sec. 2. Joint purchasing authority. 10    (a) Any governmental unit, except a governmental unit 11subject to the jurisdiction of a chief procurement officer 12established in Section 10-20 of the Illinois Procurement Code, 13may purchase personal property, supplies and services jointly 14with one or more other governmental units. All such joint 15purchases shall be by competitive solicitation as provided in 16Section 4, except as otherwise provided in this Act. The 17provisions of any other acts under which a governmental unit 18operates which refer to purchases and procedures in connection 19therewith shall be superseded by the provisions of this Act 20when the governmental units are exercising the joint powers 21created by this Act.22    (a-5) For purchases made by a governmental unit subject to 23the jurisdiction of a chief procurement officer established in 24Section 10-20 of the Illinois Procurement Code, the applicable   SB2997- 38 -LRB104 19986 HLH 33437 b1chief procurement officer established in Section 10-20 of the 2Illinois Procurement Code may authorize the purchase of 3supplies and services jointly with a governmental unit of this 4State, governmental entity of another state, or with a 5consortium of governmental entities of one or more other 6states, except as otherwise provided in this Act. Subject to 7provisions of the joint purchasing solicitation, the 8appropriate chief procurement officer may designate the 9resulting contract as available to governmental units in 10Illinois. 11    (a-10) Each chief procurement officer appointed pursuant 12to Section 10-20 of the Illinois Procurement Code, with joint 13agreement of the respective agency or institution, may 14authorize the purchase or lease of supplies and services which 15have been procured through a competitive process by a federal 16agency; a government agency of another state; a consortium of 17governmental, educational, medical, research, or similar 18entities; or a group purchasing organization of which the 19chief procurement officer or State agency is a member or 20affiliate, including, without limitation, any purchasing 21entity operating under the federal General Services 22Administration, the Higher Education Cooperation Act, and the 23Midwestern Higher Education Compact Act. Each applicable chief 24procurement officer may authorize purchases and contracts 25which have been procured by a government agency of another 26state in accordance with the laws of that state or through   SB2997- 39 -LRB104 19986 HLH 33437 b1other methods of procurement if each chief procurement officer 2determines it is in the best interests of the State, 3considering a recommendation by their respective agencies or 4institutions. The chief procurement officer may establish 5detailed rules, policies, and procedures for use of these 6cooperative contracts. Notice of award shall be published by 7the chief procurement officer in the Illinois Procurement 8Bulletin at least prior to use of the contract. Each chief 9procurement officer shall submit to the General Assembly by 10November 1 of each year a report of procurements made under 11this subsection (a-10). 12    (a-15) Each chief procurement officer appointed pursuant 13to Section 10-20 of the Illinois Procurement Code may 14authorize any governmental unit of this State to purchase or 15lease supplies under a contract which has been procured under 16the jurisdiction of the Illinois Procurement Code by a 17governmental unit subject to the jurisdiction of the chief 18procurement officer. Prior to making the contract available to 19the governmental unit of this State, the chief procurement 20officer shall consult with the governmental unit that is party 21to the contract and is subject to the jurisdiction of the chief 22procurement officer. A governmental unit of this State that 23uses a contract pursuant to this subsection shall report each 24year to the authorizing chief procurement officer the 25contractor used, supplies purchased, and total value of 26purchases for each contract. The authorizing chief procurement   SB2997- 40 -LRB104 19986 HLH 33437 b1officer shall submit to the General Assembly by November 1 of 2each year a report of procurements made under this subsection 3(a-15). 4    (b) Any not-for-profit agency that qualifies under Section 545-35 of the Illinois Procurement Code and that either (1) 6acts pursuant to a board established by or controlled by a unit 7of local government or (2) receives grant funds from the State 8or from a unit of local government, shall be eligible to 9participate in contracts established by the State.10    (c) For governmental units subject to the jurisdiction of 11a chief procurement officer established in Section 10-20 of 12the Illinois Procurement Code, if any contract or amendment to 13a contract is entered into or purchase or expenditure of funds 14is made at any time in violation of this Act or any other law, 15the contract or amendment may be declared void by the chief 16procurement officer or may be ratified and affirmed, if the 17chief procurement officer determines that ratification is in 18the best interests of the governmental unit. If the contract 19or amendment is ratified and affirmed, it shall be without 20prejudice to the governmental unit's rights to any appropriate 21damages. 22    (d) This Section does not apply to construction-related 23professional services contracts awarded in accordance with the 24provisions of the Architectural, Engineering, and Land 25Surveying Qualifications Based Selection Act. 26(Source: P.A. 103-865, eff. 1-1-25.)   SB2997- 41 -LRB104 19986 HLH 33437 b1    Section 95. No acceleration or delay. Where this Act makes 2changes in a statute that is represented in this Act by text 3that is not yet or no longer in effect (for example, a Section 4represented by multiple versions), the use of that text does 5not accelerate or delay the taking effect of (i) the changes 6made by this Act or (ii) provisions derived from any other 7Public Act.